Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [142F.16] REGIONAL FOOD BANK GRANTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of children, youth, and families shall establish regional food bank grants to increase the availability of food to individuals and families in need. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Distribution of appropriation. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall distribute money appropriated under this section to regional food banks and federally recognized American Indian Tribes or Bands in Minnesota as defined in section 10.65. The commissioner shall distribute money under this section in accordance with the federal The Emergency Food Assistance Program (TEFAP) formula and guidelines of the United States Department of Agriculture. The commissioner may increase or decrease a qualifying recipient's proportionate amount if the commissioner determines the increase or decrease is necessary to meet community needs or demands for food in Minnesota. Food banks and American Indian Tribes or Bands must be in compliance with TEFAP regulations from the United States Department of Agriculture in order to receive funding under this section, as applicable. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Allowable uses of funds. new text end new text begin (a) Money distributed under this section must be used by regional food banks to purchase, transport, and coordinate the distribution of food to TEFAP providers. new text end new text begin (b) Money distributed under this section must be used by American Indian Tribes or Bands to purchase, transport, and coordinate the distribution of food to individuals and families in need. new text end new text begin (c) Money distributed under this section may also be used to purchase personal hygiene products, including but not limited to diapers and toilet paper. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin (a) Food banks and American Indian Tribes or Bands receiving money under this section must retain records documenting expenditure of the money and comply with any additional documentation requirements imposed by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) Food banks and American Indian Tribes or Bands shall report on the use of money received under this section to the commissioner. The commissioner shall determine the timing and form required for the reports. new text end new text begin (c) If the commissioner determines that ineligible expenditures are made by food banks or American Indian Tribes or Bands receiving money under this section, the ineligible amount must be repaid to the commissioner and deposited in the general fund. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; REGIONAL FOOD BANK GRANTS.new text end new text begin $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for the purposes of Minnesota Statutes, section 142F.16. new text end